California statutes. Penal Code
(a) In the case of any inmate who committed a felony prior to July 1, 1977, who would have been sentenced under Section 1170 if he or she had committed it after July 1, 1977, the Board of Prison Terms shall determine what the length of time of imprisonment would have been under Section 1170 without consideration of good-time credit and utilizing the middle term of the offense bearing the longest term of imprisonment of which the prisoner was convicted increased by any enhancements justified by matters found to be true and which were imposed by the court at the time of sentencing for such felony. These matters include: being armed
 with a deadly or dangerous weapon as specified in Section 211a, 460, 3024, or 12022 prior to July 1, 1977, which may result in a one-year enhancement pursuant to the provisions of Section 12022; using a firearm as specified in Section 12022.5 prior to July 1, 1977, which may result in a two-year enhancement pursuant to the provisions of Section 12022.5; infliction of great bodily injury as specified in Section 213, 264, or 461 prior to July 1, 1977, which may result in a three-year enhancement pursuant to the provisions of Section 12022.7; any prior felony conviction as specified in any statute prior to July 1, 1977, which prior felony conviction is the equivalent of a prior prison term as defined in Section 667.5, which may result in the appropriate enhancement pursuant to the provisions of Section 667.5; and any consecutive sentence.

(b) If the calculation required under subdivision (a) is less than the time to be served prior to a release
 date set prior to July 1, 1977, or if a release date had not been set, the Board of Prison Terms shall establish the prisoner’s parole date, subject to subdivision (d), on the date calculated under subdivision (a) unless at least two of the commissioners of the Board of Prison Terms after reviewing the prisoner’s file, determine that due to the number of crimes of which the prisoner was convicted, or due to the number of prior convictions suffered by the prisoner, or due to the fact that the prisoner was armed with a deadly weapon when the crime was committed, or used a deadly weapon during the commission of the crime, or inflicted or attempted to inflict great bodily injury on the victim of the crime, the prisoner should serve a term longer than that calculated in subdivision (a), in which event the prisoner shall be entitled to a hearing before a panel consisting of at least two commissioners of the Board of Prison Terms as provided for in Section 3041.5. The Board of Prison Terms shall notify each
 prisoner who is scheduled for such a hearing within 90 days of July 1, 1977, or within 90 days of the date the prisoner is received by or returned to the custody of the Department of Corrections, whichever is later. The hearing shall be held before October 1, 1978, or within 120 days of receipt of the prisoner, whichever is later. It is the intent of the Legislature that the hearings provided for in this subdivision shall be accomplished in the most expeditious manner possible. At the hearing the prisoner shall be entitled to be represented by legal counsel, a release date shall be set, and the prisoner shall be informed in writing of the extraordinary factors specifically considered determinative and on what basis the release date has been calculated. In fixing a term under this section the board shall be guided by, but not limited to, the term which reasonably could be imposed on a person who committed a similar offense under similar circumstances on or after July 1, 1977, and further, the board shall be
 guided by the following finding and declaration hereby made by the Legislature: that the necessity to protect the public from repetition of extraordinary crimes of violence against the person is the paramount consideration.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to keep an inmate in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a period of time longer than he would have been kept in its custody under the provisions of law applicable to him prior to July 1, 1977. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require the release of an inmate sentenced to consecutive sentences under the provisions of law applicable to him prior to July 1, 1977, earlier than if he had been sentenced to concurrent sentences.

(d) In the case of any prisoner who committed a felony prior to July 1, 1977, who would have been sentenced under Section 1170 if the felony was committed on or after July 1,
 1977, the good behavior and participation provisions of Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 2930) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 of Part 3 shall apply from July 1, 1977, and thereafter.

(e) In the case of any inmate who committed a felony prior to July 1, 1977, who would have been sentenced under Section 1168 if the felony was committed on or after July 1, 1977, the Board of Prison Terms shall provide for release from prison as provided for by this code.

(f) In the case of any inmate who committed a felony prior to July 1, 1977, the length, conditions, revocation, and other incidents of parole shall be the same as if the prisoner had been sentenced for an offense committed on or after July 1, 1977.

(g) Nothing in this chapter shall affect the eligibility for parole under Article 3 (commencing with Section 3040) of Chapter
 8 of Title 1 of Part 3 of an inmate sentenced pursuant to Section 1168 as operative prior to July 1, 1977, for a period of parole as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3000.

(h) In fixing a term under this section, the Board of Prison Terms shall utilize the terms of imprisonment as provided in Chapter 1139 of the Statutes of 1976 and Chapter 165 of the Statutes of 1977.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 568, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.21.

A conviction for a violation of Section 647f as it read on December 31, 2017, is invalid and vacated. All charges alleging violation of Section 647f are dismissed and all arrests for violation of Section 647f are deemed to have never occurred. An individual who was arrested, charged, or convicted for a violation of Section 647f may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior arrest, charge, or conviction under Section 647f that he or she was not arrested, charged, or convicted for a violation of Section 647f. Notwithstanding any other law, information pertaining to an individual’s arrest, charge, or conviction for violation of Section 647f shall not, without the individual’s consent, be used in any way adverse to his or her
 interests, including, but not limited to, denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 537, Sec. 13.   (SB 239)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.22.

(a) A person who is serving a sentence as a result of a violation of Section 647f as it read on December 31, 2017, whether by trial or by open or negotiated plea, may petition for a recall or dismissal of sentence before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in his or her case.

(b) If the court’s records show that the petitioner was convicted for a violation of Section 647f as it read on December 31, 2017, the court shall vacate the conviction and resentence the person for any remaining counts.

(c) A person who is serving a sentence and resentenced pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be
 given credit for any time already served and shall be subject to whatever supervision time he or she would have otherwise been subject to after release, whichever is shorter, unless the court, in its discretion, as part of its resentencing order, releases the person from supervision.

(d) Under no circumstances may resentencing under this section result in the imposition of a term longer than the original sentence, or the reinstatement of charges dismissed pursuant to a negotiated plea agreement.

(e) Upon completion of sentence for a conviction under Section 647f as it read on December 31, 2017, the provisions of Section 1170.21 shall apply.

(f) Nothing in this and related sections is intended to diminish or abrogate
 the finality of judgments in any case not falling within the purview of this section.

(g) A resentencing hearing ordered under this section shall constitute a “post-conviction release proceeding” under paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution.

(h) The provisions of this section apply to juvenile delinquency adjudications and dispositions under Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code if the juvenile would not have been guilty of an offense or would not have been guilty of an offense governed by this section.

(i) The Judicial Council shall promulgate and make available all necessary forms to enable the filing of petitions and applications provided in this
 section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 537, Sec. 14.   (SB 239)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.3.

The Judicial Council shall seek to promote uniformity in sentencing under Section 1170 by:

(a) The adoption of rules providing criteria for the consideration of the trial judge at the time of sentencing regarding the court’s decision to:

(1) Grant or deny probation.

(2) Impose the lower or upper prison term.

(3) Impose the lower or upper term pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(4) Impose concurrent or consecutive sentences.

(5) Determine whether or not to impose an enhancement where that determination is permitted by law.

(6) Deny a period of mandatory supervision in the interests of justice under paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170 or determine the appropriate period and conditions of mandatory supervision. The rules implementing this paragraph shall be adopted no later than January 1, 2015.

(7) Determine the county or counties of incarceration and supervision when the court is imposing a judgment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 concurrent or consecutive to a judgment or judgments previously imposed pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 in a county or counties.

(b) The adoption of rules
 standardizing the minimum content and the sequential presentation of material in probation officer reports submitted to the court regarding probation and mandatory supervision under paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2022.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 887, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2017, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   (SB 670)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative January 1, 2022, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.4.

The Judicial Council shall collect and analyze relevant information relating to sentencing practices in this state and other jurisdictions. Such information shall be taken into consideration by the Judicial Council in the adoption of rules pursuant to Section 1170.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 909, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.45.

The Judicial Council shall collect data on criminal cases statewide relating to the disposition of those cases according to the race and ethnicity of the defendant, and report annually thereon to the Legislature beginning no later than January 1, 1999. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds to the Judicial Council for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 850, Sec. 48.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.5.

The Judicial Council shall conduct annual sentencing institutes for trial court judges pursuant to Section 68551 of the Government Code, toward the end of assisting the judge in the imposition of appropriate sentences.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1139.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.7.

Robbery or attempted robbery for the purpose of obtaining any controlled substance, as defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, when committed against a pharmacist, pharmacy employee, or other person lawfully possessing controlled substances, shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 67.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.71.

The fact that a person who commits a violation of Section 288 has used obscene or harmful matter to induce, persuade, or encourage the minor to engage in a lewd or lascivious act shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.72.

Upon conviction of a violation of Section 11353, 11353.5, 11353.7, 11354, 11361, or 11380 of the Health and Safety Code, or a finding of truth of an enhancing allegation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 11353.1, Section 11353.6, or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 11380.1, the fact that the minor was 11 years of age or younger shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation when imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.73.

Upon conviction of a felony violation of Section 11377, 11378, or 11378.5 of the Health and Safety Code, the court shall consider the quantity of controlled substance involved in determining whether to impose an aggravated term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 777, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.74.

Upon conviction of a felony violation of Section 11377, 11378, 11379, or 11379.6 of the Health and Safety Code, for an offense involving methamphetamine, the fact that the controlled substance is the crystalline form of methamphetamine shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 952, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.76.

The fact that a defendant who commits or attempts to commit a violation of Section 243.4, 245, or 273.5 is or has been a member of the household of a minor or of the victim of the offense, or the defendant is a marital or blood relative of the minor or the victim, or the defendant or the victim is the natural parent, adoptive parent, stepparent, or foster parent of the minor, and the offense contemporaneously occurred in the presence of, or was witnessed by, the minor shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under
 subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 279, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.78.

Upon a conviction of a violation of Section 451, the fact that the person committed the offense in retaliation against the owner or occupant of the property or structure burned, or against one believed by the person to be the owner or occupant of the property or structure burned, for any eviction or other legal action taken by the owner or occupant, or believed owner or occupant, shall be a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 602, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.8.

(a) The fact that a robbery or an assault with a deadly weapon or instrument or by means of any force likely to produce great bodily injury was committed against a person while that person was in a church, synagogue, or building owned and occupied by a religious educational institution, or any other place primarily used as a place of worship where religious services are regularly conducted, shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(b) Upon conviction of any person for a violation of Section 451
 or 453, the fact that the person intentionally burned, or intended to burn, a church, synagogue, or building owned and occupied by a religious educational institution, or any other place primarily used as a place of worship where religious services are regularly conducted, shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 929, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.81.

The fact that the intended victim of an attempted life term crime was a peace officer, as described in subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.1, or Section 830.2, 830.5 or 830.6, while the peace officer was engaged in the performance of his or her duties, and the defendant knew or reasonably should have known that the victim was a peace officer engaged in the performance of his or her duties, shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1031, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.82.

Upon a conviction of a violation of Section 11352, 11360, 11379, or 11379.5 of the Health and Safety Code, the fact that the person who committed the offense knew, or reasonably should have known, that any of the following circumstances existed with regard to the person to whom he or she unlawfully sold, furnished, administered, or gave away a controlled substance, shall be a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1170:

(a) The person was
 pregnant at the time of the selling, furnishing, administering, or giving away of the controlled substance.

(b) The person had been previously convicted of a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(c) The person was in psychological treatment for a mental disorder or for substance abuse at the time of the selling, furnishing, administering, or giving away of the controlled substance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 352, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.84.

Upon conviction of any serious felony, listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, it shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170 if, during the course of the serious felony, the person engaged in the tying, binding, or confining of any victim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1216, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.85.

(a) Upon conviction of any felony assault or battery offense, it shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation of the crime in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170 if the offense was committed to prevent or dissuade a person who is or may become a witness from attending upon or testifying at any trial, proceeding, or inquiry authorized by law, or if the offense was committed because the person provided assistance or information to a law enforcement officer, or to a public prosecutor in a criminal or juvenile court proceeding.

(b) Upon conviction of
 any felony it shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170 if the victim of an offense is particularly vulnerable, or unable to defend himself or herself, due to age or significant disability.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1108, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.86.

Upon conviction of a felony violation of Section 220, 261, 261.5, 264.1, or 266j the fact that the felony was committed within a safe school zone, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 626, against a victim who was a pupil currently attending school, shall be considered a circumstance in aggravation in imposing a term under subdivision (b) of Section 1170.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 279, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.89.

Where there is an applicable triad for an enhancement related to the possession of, being armed with, use of, or furnishing or supplying a firearm, set forth in Section 12021.5, 12022, 12022.2, 12022.3, 12022.4, 12022.5, or 12022.55 the fact that a person knew or had reason to believe that a firearm was stolen shall constitute a circumstance in aggravation of the enhancement justifying imposition of the upper term on that enhancement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 279, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.9.

(a) In the case of any person convicted of a criminal offense who could otherwise be sentenced to county jail or state prison and who alleges that the person committed the offense as a result of sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems stemming from service in the United States military, the court shall, prior to sentencing, make a determination as to whether the defendant was, or currently is, a member of the United States military and whether the defendant may be suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems as a result of the person’s service. The court may request, through existing resources, an assessment to aid in that determination.

(b) (1) If the court concludes that a defendant convicted of a criminal offense is a person described in subdivision (a), and if the defendant is otherwise eligible for probation, the court shall consider the circumstances described in subdivision (a) as a factor in favor of granting probation.

(2) If the court places the defendant on probation, the court may order the defendant into a local, state, federal, or private nonprofit treatment program for a period not to exceed that period which the defendant would have served in state prison or county jail, provided the defendant agrees to participate in the program and the court determines that an appropriate treatment program exists.

(c) If a referral is made to the county mental health authority, the county shall be obligated to provide mental
 health treatment services only to the extent that resources are available for that purpose, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. If mental health treatment services are ordered by the court, the county mental health agency shall coordinate appropriate referral of the defendant to the county veterans service officer, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 5600.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The county mental health agency shall not be responsible for providing services outside its traditional scope of services. An order shall be made referring a defendant to a county mental health agency only if that agency has agreed to accept responsibility for the treatment of the defendant.

(d) When determining the “needs of the defendant,” for purposes of Section 1202.7, the court shall consider the fact that the defendant is a person described in subdivision
 (a) in assessing whether the defendant should be placed on probation and ordered into a federal or community-based treatment service program with a demonstrated history of specializing in the treatment of mental health problems, including substance abuse, post-traumatic stress disorder, traumatic brain injury, military sexual trauma, and other related mental health problems.

(e) A defendant granted probation under this section and committed to a residential treatment program shall earn sentence credits for the actual time the defendant serves in residential treatment.

(f) The court, in making an order under this section to commit a defendant to an established treatment program, shall give preference to a treatment program that has a history of successfully treating veterans who suffer from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or
 mental health problems as a result of that service, including, but not limited to, programs operated by the United States Department of Defense or the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.

(g) The court and the assigned treatment program may collaborate with the Department of Veterans Affairs and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to maximize benefits and services provided to the veteran.

(h) (1) It is in the interests of justice to restore a defendant who acquired a criminal record due to a mental health disorder stemming from service in the United States military to the community of law abiding citizens. The restorative provisions of this subdivision apply to cases in which a trial court or a court monitoring the defendant’s performance of probation pursuant to this section finds at a public hearing, held after not less than 15 days’
 notice to the prosecution, the defense, and any victim of the offense, that all of the following describe the defendant:

(A) The defendant was granted probation and was at the time that probation was granted a person described in subdivision (a).

(B) The defendant is in substantial compliance with the conditions of that probation.

(C) The defendant has successfully participated in court-ordered treatment and services to address the sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems stemming from military service.

(D) The defendant does not represent a danger to the health and safety of others.

(E) The defendant has demonstrated
 significant benefit from court-ordered education, treatment, or rehabilitation to clearly show that granting restorative relief pursuant to this subdivision would be in the interests of justice.

(2) When determining whether granting restorative relief pursuant to this subdivision is in the interests of justice, the court may consider, among other factors, all of the following:

(A) The defendant’s completion and degree of participation in education, treatment, and rehabilitation as ordered by the court.

(B) The defendant’s progress in formal education.

(C) The defendant’s development of career potential.

(D) The defendant’s leadership and personal responsibility efforts.

(E) The defendant’s contribution of service in support of the community.

(3) If the court finds that a case satisfies each of the requirements described in paragraph (1), then the court may take any of the following actions by a written order setting forth the reasons for so doing:

(A) Deem all conditions of probation to be satisfied, including fines, fees, assessments, and programs, and terminate probation prior to the expiration of the term of probation. This subparagraph does not apply to any court-ordered victim restitution.

(B) Reduce an eligible felony to a misdemeanor pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17.

(C) Grant relief in accordance with Section 1203.4.

(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Section 1203.4, a dismissal of the action pursuant to this subdivision has the following effect:

(A) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, a dismissal of the action pursuant to this subdivision releases the defendant from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense of which the defendant has been convicted in the dismissed action.

(B) A dismissal pursuant to this subdivision does not apply to any of the following:

(i) A conviction pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 42002.1 of the Vehicle Code.

(ii) A felony conviction pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 261.5.

(iii) A conviction pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 286.

(iv) A conviction pursuant to Section 288.

(v) A conviction pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 287 or former Section 288a.

(vi) A conviction pursuant to Section 288.5.

(vii) A conviction pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 289.

(viii) The requirement to register pursuant to Section 290.

(C) The defendant is not obligated to disclose the arrest on the dismissed action, the dismissed action, or the conviction that was set aside when information concerning prior arrests or convictions is requested to be given under oath, affirmation, or otherwise.
 The defendant may indicate that the defendant has not been arrested when the defendant’s only arrest concerns the dismissed action, except when the defendant is required to disclose the arrest, the conviction that was set aside, and the dismissed action in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for any law enforcement position.

(D) A dismissal pursuant to this subdivision may, in the discretion of the court, order the sealing of police records of the arrest and court records of the dismissed action, thereafter viewable by the public only in accordance with a court order.

(E) The dismissal of the action pursuant to this subdivision is a bar to any future action based on the conduct charged in the dismissed action.

(F) In any subsequent prosecution for any other offense, a
 conviction that was set aside in the dismissed action may be pleaded and proved as a prior conviction and has the same effect as if the dismissal pursuant to this subdivision had not been granted.

(G) A conviction that was set aside in the dismissed action may be considered a conviction for the purpose of administratively revoking or suspending or otherwise limiting the defendant’s driving privilege on the ground of two or more convictions.

(H) The defendant’s DNA sample and profile in the DNA data bank shall not be removed by a dismissal pursuant to this subdivision.

(I) Dismissal of an accusation, information, or conviction pursuant to this section does not authorize a defendant to own, possess, or have in the defendant’s custody or control any firearm or prevent the defendant’s conviction pursuant to Chapter 2
 (commencing with Section 29800) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 205.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1170.91.

(a) If the court concludes that a defendant convicted of a felony offense is, or was, a member of the United States military who may be suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems as a result of the defendant’s military service, the court shall consider the circumstance as a factor in mitigation when imposing a sentence. This consideration does not preclude the court from considering similar trauma, injury, substance abuse, or mental health problems due to other causes, as evidence or factors in mitigation.

(b) (1) A person currently serving a sentence for a felony conviction,
 whether by trial or plea, who is, or was, a member of the United States military and who may be suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems as a result of the person’s military service may petition for a recall of sentence, before the trial court that entered the judgment of conviction in the case, to request resentencing if the circumstance of suffering from sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, substance abuse, or mental health problems as a result of the person’s military service was not considered as a factor in mitigation at the time of
 sentencing.

(2) If the court that originally sentenced the person is not available, the presiding judge shall designate another judge to rule on the petition.

(3) Upon receiving a petition under this subdivision, the court shall determine, at a public hearing held after not less than 15 days’ notice to the prosecution, the defense, and any victim of the offense, whether the person satisfies the criteria in this subdivision. At that hearing, the prosecution shall have an opportunity to be heard on the petitioner’s eligibility and suitability for resentencing. If the person satisfies the criteria, the court may, in
 the interest of justice, and regardless of whether the original sentence was imposed after a trial or plea, do either of the following:

(A) Reduce the defendant’s term of imprisonment by modifying the sentence.

(B) Vacate
 the conviction and impose judgment on any necessarily included lesser offense or lesser related offense, whether or not that offense was charged in the original pleading, and then
 resentence the defendant to a reduced term of imprisonment with the concurrence of both the defendant and the district attorney of the county in which the defendant was sentenced or by the Attorney General if the case was originally prosecuted by the Department of Justice.

(4) A person who is resentenced pursuant to this subdivision shall be given credit for time served.

(5) Resentencing under this subdivision shall not result in the imposition of a term longer than the original sentence.

(6) This subdivision does
 not alter or diminish any rights conferred under Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution (Marsy’s Law).

(7) This subdivision does not diminish or abrogate any rights or remedies otherwise available to the person.

(8) This subdivision does not diminish or abrogate the finality of judgments in any case not falling within the purview of this subdivision.

(9) This subdivision does not impose an obligation on the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to provide medical or mental health assessments in order to identify potential service-related injuries.

(10) This subdivision shall apply retroactively.

(c) This section does not apply to a person convicted of, or having one or more prior convictions for, an offense specified in clause (iv) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 667 or an offense requiring registration pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 290.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   (SB 1209)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “postconviction proceeding” means a proceeding to modify a sentence or conviction pursuant to an ameliorative statute. Ameliorative statutes include, but are not limited to, Sections 1170.18, 1172.1, 1172.6, 1172.7, and 1172.75.

(b) On or before March 1, 2025, the presiding judge of each county superior court, or their designee, shall convene a meeting to develop a plan for fair and efficient handling of postconviction proceedings. The presiding judge shall invite to the meeting a representative from the district attorney, the public defender or other representative of indigent defense services, and other entities that the presiding judge deems
 necessary in order to ensure timely and efficient postconviction proceedings. At the meeting, the presiding judge or their designee shall determine how postconviction proceedings will be assigned to individual judges, including whether they will take place before the original sentencing judge or designated judge. The presiding judge may set further meetings at their discretion.

(c) The following shall apply for all postconviction proceedings unless there is a conflict with a more specific rule established in statute, in which case the more specific statute shall apply:

(1) Upon receiving a request to begin a postconviction proceeding that is authorized in law, the court shall consider whether to appoint counsel to represent the defendant. This section does not prevent the court
 from assigning counsel at a later time.

(2) The court shall consider any pertinent circumstances that have arisen since the prior sentence was imposed and has jurisdiction to modify every aspect of the defendant’s sentence, including if it was imposed after a guilty plea.

(3) Any changes to a sentence shall not be a basis for a prosecutor or court to rescind a plea agreement.

(4) The court shall state on the record the reasons for its decision to grant or deny the initial request to begin a postconviction proceeding and shall provide notice to the defendant of its decision.

(5) After ruling on a request, the court shall advise the defendant of their right to appeal
 and the necessary steps and time for taking an appeal.

(6) The parties may waive a hearing and proceed directly to the resentencing. A defendant may waive their personal presence at a resentencing hearing and may appear via remote technology. If a victim of a crime wishes to be heard pursuant to the provisions of Section 28 of Article I of the California Constitution, or pursuant to any other provision of law applicable to the hearing, the victim shall notify the prosecution of their request to be heard within 15 days of being notified that resentencing is being sought and the court shall provide an opportunity for the victim to be heard.

(7) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, including Sections 13201 and 11081, and Sections 1798.24 and 1798.34 of the Civil Code,
 upon request from the defendant’s attorney, the district attorney of the county in which the defendant was sentenced, or the Attorney General if the Department of Justice originally prosecuted the case, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, in accordance with this subparagraph and subparagraph (C), provide to the requesting party a case summary, disciplinary records, programming records, chronos, and any other material the department deems relevant to a postconviction proceeding.

(B) For requests submitted on or after January 1, 2026, the records shall be provided within 45 days of the request unless the requestor agrees to extend this period. The records shall be provided in a secure electronic format. This section does not diminish the ability of parties or the court to request additional records, which shall be
 provided by the department as soon as is practicable.

(C) If the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has in its possession relevant records it has determined are confidential under the department’s regulations, the department shall redact such portions before producing the records to the requestor.

(D) Any party may file a motion with the court presiding over a postconviction proceeding seeking disclosure of anything redacted under subparagraph (C). In addition to the parties required to be served such a motion, service is required upon the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation through the person designated under subdivision (d). The court shall determine whether good cause exists for in-camera review of the redacted material. If the court determines that
 good cause exists for in-camera review, the department shall provide the unredacted material for in-camera review within seven days. After an in-camera review, the court shall order disclosure of any redacted material that may be relevant to the postconviction proceeding and issue an appropriate protective order limiting the use and scope of the disclosure.

(E) To protect personal privacy and other legitimate interests, each party shall redact sensitive information as required by state and federal law and rules of court from all pleadings and other papers filed in the court’s public file, whether filed in paper or electronic form, under this section.

(F) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall promulgate regulations to implement subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive.
